Louisiana, session 2026, HB469.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1207(A)(2)(a)(i) and (b) and 1230(A)(2)(a)(i) and (b) are hereby
amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1207. Renewal of license, registration, and certification; expiration; reinstatement
A.
* * *
(2)(a)(i) The board shall assess on each pharmacist license renewal as
required by this Section an additional fee of one hundred dollars per year to be
designated as the "pharmacy education support fee". This fee shall be dedicated and
allocated as specified in this Paragraph to an accredited school of pharmacy of a
public university in this state. The board shall include on each license renewal form
issued to a pharmacist an optional election whereby the person may elect not to remit
the one hundred dollar pharmacy education support fee. The board shall also include
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1013 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 469
on the license renewal form a list of eligible schools of pharmacy, including but not
limited to Xavier of Louisiana College of Pharmacy, and provide an area for the
pharmacist to designate which school of pharmacy receives the fee.
* * *
(b) The board shall disburse all monies collected pursuant to this Paragraph
to an the accredited public university pharmacy school in this state selected by the
pharmacist on or before April first annually. The public university pharmacy school
shall utilize these monies solely for the benefit of its pharmacy education program
and the expenditure of such funds shall be approved by the board of supervisors of
the university system of which the university is a member. The funds collected
pursuant to this Paragraph shall be in addition to any other monies received by the
university that operates the pharmacy school and are intended to supplement and not
replace, displace, or supplant any other funds that the university receives from the
state or from any other source.
* * *
§1230. Renewal of permits; expiration; reinstatement
A.
* * *
(2)(a)(i) The board shall assess on each pharmacy permit renewal required
by this Section an additional fee of one hundred dollars per year to be designated as
the "pharmacy education support fee". This fee shall be dedicated and allocated as
specified in this Paragraph to an accredited school of pharmacy of a public university
in this state. The board shall include on each permit renewal form issued to a
pharmacy an optional election whereby the pharmacy may elect not to remit the one
hundred dollar pharmacy education support fee. The board shall also include on the
permit renewal form a list of eligible schools of pharmacy, including but not limited
to Xavier of Louisiana College of Pharmacy, and provide an area for the pharmacist
to designate which school of pharmacy receives the fee.
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1013 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 469
(b) The board shall disburse all monies collected pursuant to this Paragraph
to an accredited public university pharmacy school in this state selected by the
pharmacist on or before April first annually. The public university pharmacy school
shall utilize these monies solely for the benefit of its pharmacy education program
and the expenditure of such funds shall be approved by the board of supervisors of
the university system of which the university is a member. The funds collected
pursuant to this Paragraph shall be in addition to any other monies received by the
university that operates the pharmacy school and are intended to supplement and not
replace, displace, or supplant any other funds that the university receives from the
state or from any other source.
* * *